Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3585
Hospital authority; formation; submission to health planning agency prior to hearing; findings.

Prior to the holding of a hearing on the petitions, the question of forming the proposed hospital authority shall be submitted to the appropriate local or area health planning agency for its consideration and review if there has been created, pursuant to state or federal law, such a local or area health planning agency having jurisdiction within the area in which the proposed hospital authority is to be established. Such local or area health planning agency shall within sixty days render its findings and recommendations, if any, and shall be deemed to have approved the formation of the proposed hospital authority if its findings and recommendations have not been rendered within such period of sixty days.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 733, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.80.